Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Statewide Public Defender System Act [Repealed]

§§ 25-32-31 through 25-32-65.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2000, ch. 569, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§25-32-31. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-33. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-35. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-37. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-39. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-41. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-43. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-45. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-47. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-49. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-51. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-53. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-55. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-57. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-59. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-61. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-63. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]

§25-32-65. [Laws, 1998, ch. 575, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1998, provided the new programs authorized by Laws, 1998, ch. 575, are funded and certified]